th: รูปแบบการพกพากระเป๋า/เคส: ทรงกระเป๋าเป้; เคสพร้อมสายสะพายเป้; สะพายได้ 2 แบบ (ถือ+สะพายเป้); ถือแบบกระเป๋าเอกสาร; ทรงกระเป๋าสะพายไหล่; มีล้อ/ลาก; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu dáng mang túi/vỏ: Kiểu ba lô; Hộp có quai đeo ba lô; Mang kép (xách tay + ba lô); Xách tay kiểu cặp táp; Kiểu túi đeo vai; Có bánh xe/kéo lăn; Khác
ja: バッグ／ケース持ち運びスタイル: バックパックスタイル; バックパックハーネス付きケース; デュアルキャリー (手持ち + バックパック); 手持ちブリーフケーススタイル; ショルダーバッグスタイル; キャスター付き/ローリング; その他
ru: Тип переноски сумки/чехла: В виде рюкзака; Чехол с лямками рюкзака; Комбинированный (в руке + рюкзак); В руке (в стиле портфеля); В стиле сумки через плечо; На колесах/на роликах; Другое
ko: 가방/케이스 휴대 방식: 백팩 스타일; 백팩 하네스 케이스; 듀얼 캐리(손 + 백팩); 핸드 캐리 서류 가방 스타일; 숄더백 스타일; 바퀴/롤링; 기타
es: Estilo de transporte del bolso/caja: Estilo mochila; Estuche con arnés de mochila; Doble transporte (mano y mochila); Estilo maletín de mano; Estilo bolso de hombro; Con ruedas/rodante; Otro
nl: Tas/koffer draagstijl: Rugzakstijl; Koffer met rugzakharnas; Dubbel dragen (hand + rugzak); Aktetasstijl (in de hand); Schoudertasstijl; Op wielen/rollend; Overig
pt-PT: Estilo de transporte da bolsa/estojo: Estilo mochila; Mala com arnês de mochila; Transporte duplo (mão + mochila); Transporte à mão tipo pasta; Estilo saco de ombro; Com rodas/rolante; Outro
pl: Styl noszenia torby/pokrowca: Styl plecaka; Futerał z szelkami plecakowymi; Dwa sposoby noszenia (w ręce i na plecach); Do noszenia w ręce (w stylu teczki); W stylu torby na ramię; Na kółkach; Inne
tr: Çanta/kılıf taşıma şekli: Sırt çantası stili; Sırt çantası askılı taşıma kılıfı; Çift taşıma (elde + sırt çantası); Elde taşıma evrak çantası stili; Omuz çantası stili; Tekerlekli/çekçekli; Diğer
da: Bærestil for taske/æske: Rygsækstil; Kuffert med rygsæksele; Dobbeltbæresystem (hånd og rygsæk); Håndbåren kuffertstil; Skuldertaskestil; Med hjul/rullende; Andet
fr: Style de port du sac ou de la housse: Type sac à dos; Étui avec harnais de sac à dos; Double transport (main et sac à dos); Transport à la main type mallette; Type sac à bandoulière; À roulettes; Autre
sv: Stil på bärväska/fodral: Ryggsäcksstil; Fodral med ryggsäckssele; Dubbelt bärande (hand + ryggsäck); Handbärande i portföljstil; Axelremsväskstil; Hjul/rullande; Övrigt
sl-SI: Način nošenja torbe/etuija: Nahrbtnik; Kovček z naramnicami; Dvojno prenašanje (v roki in kot nahrbtnik); V roki (kot aktovka); Torba za čez ramo; S kolesci/na koleščkih; Drugo
lt-LT: Krepšio / dėklo nešiojimo būdas: Kuprinės tipo; Dėklas su kuprinės diržais; Dvejopas nešiojimas (rankoje ir kaip kuprinę); Lagamino tipo (nešiojama rankoje); Krepšio per petį tipo; Su ratukais / riedantis; Kita
hu: Zsák/doboz hordási stílusa: Hátizsák stílusú; Tok hátizsák pántokkal; Kettős hordozás (kézi + hátizsák); Kézi aktatáska stílusú; Válltáska stílusú; Kerekes/görgős; Egyéb
cs: Způsob nošení tašky nebo pouzdra: Jako batoh; Pouzdro s popruhy na záda; Kombinované (do ruky i na záda); Do ruky (jako aktovka); Přes rameno; Na kolečkách; Jiné
it: Stile di trasporto a borsa/cassa: A zaino; Custodia con spallacci a zaino; Doppio trasporto (a mano + zaino); A mano tipo valigetta; A tracolla; Con ruote; Altro
de: Transportart von Gigbag/Koffer: Rucksack-Stil; Koffer mit Rucksackgurten; Duales Tragen (Hand + Rucksack); Handgepäck im Aktenkoffer-Stil; Umhängetaschen-Stil; Mit Rollen; Sonstige
ro-RO: Stil de purtare pentru geantă/carcasă: Tip rucsac; Husă cu ham pentru rucsac; Purtare dublă (mână + rucsac); Purtare în mână, tip servietă; Tip geantă de umăr; Cu roți/troler; Altele
bg-BG: Стил на носене на чанта/калъф: Тип раница; Калъф с презрамки за раница; Двойно носене (на ръка + раница); Ръчно носене тип куфарче; Тип чанта за рамо; На колела; Друго
el: Στυλ τσάντας/θήκης μεταφοράς: Τύπου σακιδίου πλάτης; Θήκη με ιμάντες σακιδίου πλάτης; Διπλής μεταφοράς (χειρός + πλάτης); Χειρός (τύπου χαρτοφύλακα); Τύπου τσάντας ώμου; Με ρόδες/τροχήλατο; Άλλο
en: Bag/case carrying style: Backpack-style; Case with backpack harness; Dual-carry (hand + backpack); Hand-carry briefcase-style; Shoulder bag-style; Wheeled/rolling; Other
nb: Bærestil for veske/eske: Ryggsekk-stil; Etui med ryggsekksele; Dobbel bæring (hånd + ryggsekk); Håndbåret koffertstil; Skulderveskestil; Med hjul/rullende; Annet
pt-BR: Estilo de transporte interno da bolsa/estojo: Estilo mochila; Mala com alças de mochila; Transporte duplo (mão e mochila); Transporte manual estilo maleta; Estilo bolsa de ombro; Com rodinhas/rolante; Outro
hr-HR: Stil nošenja koncertne torbe/kofera: U stilu ruksaka; Kovčeg s naramenicama za ruksak; Dvostruko nošenje (ruka + ruksak); Ručno nošenje u stilu aktovke; U stilu torbe preko ramena; Na kotačiće; Ostalo
fi: Laukun/kotelon kantotapa: Repputyylinen; Kotelo reppuvaljailla; Kaksoiskanto (käsi + reppu); Kädessä kannettava salkkutyylinen; Olkakassityylinen; Pyörällinen/vedettävä; Muu
sk-SK: Štýl nosenia tašky/príslušenstva: V štýle batoha; Puzdro s popruhmi ako batoh; Dvojité nosenie (ruka + batoh); Do ruky v štýle kufríka; V štýle tašky cez rameno; Na kolieskach/na ťahanie; Iný
zh-CN: 包/箱携带方式: 背包式; 配备背包背带的提箱; 双向携带（手提 + 双肩背）; 手提公文包式; 单肩包式; 滚轮/拉杆式; 其他
zh-TW: 袋/盒攜帶樣式: 後背包款式; 附雙肩背帶保護殼; 雙重背法 (手提 + 後背); 手提公事包款式; 肩背包款式; 附滾輪/拉桿; 其他